Washington statutes.
RCW 43.330.062

Recruitment and retention of business—Protocols for associate development organizations and department staff.

In carrying out its responsibilities under RCW 43.330.060 and 43.330.080, the department must establish protocols to be followed by associate development organizations and department staff for the recruitment and retention of businesses. The protocols must specify the circumstances under which an associate development organization is required to notify the department of its business recruitment and retention efforts and when the department must notify the associate development organization of its business recruitment and retention efforts. The protocols established may not require the release of proprietary information or the disclosure of information that a client company has requested remain confidential. The department must require compliance with the protocols in its contracts with associate development organizations.

[ 2011 c 286 s 1.]